Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.40
Tax Commissioner, defined.

Tax Commissioner means the Tax Commissioner of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 22;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 77-2702.21;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 44.